uz.dic
abstraksiya/ABCD
aviatrassa/ABCD
avtomatchi/ABCD
agitpoyezd/ABCD
advokatura/ABCD
ajabsanda/ABCD
azm/ABCD
aylanuvchanlik/ABCD
aqiqa/ABCD
alebastr/ABCD
allometamorfizm/ABCD
alyumotermiya/ABCD
amorf/ABCD
angillash/ABCD
anjumansozlik/ABCD
arava/ABCD
arena/ABCD
armatura/ABCD
arus/ABCD
askarboshilik/ABCD
assiriylar/ABCD
ataraks/ABCD
afisha/ABCD
ah-ah/ABCD
achchiqlik/ABCD
ayamoqlik/ABCD
badzodlik/ABCD
bayoti/ABCD
bakteriostatik/ABCD
balli/ABCD
bantik/ABCD
barmoqsiz/ABCD
baxaoar/ABCD
bachadon/ABCD
bevafolik/ABCD
bezaboi/ABCD
bekatcha/ABCD
bemajol/ABCD
beozor/ABCD
beta/ABCD
befirqa/ABCD
beshlik/ABCD
bikvadrat/ABCD
bilmasdan/ABCD
biotik/ABCD
biroq/ABCD
blefarit/ABCD
bodano'sh/ABCD
boyterak/ABCD
bolish/ABCD
bosvoldi/ABCD
boshqaruvchilik/ABCD
bronenoses/ABCD
bug'li/ABCD
buzido'z/ABCD
bukilgansimon/ABCD
bulg'antirish/ABCD
bulutzor/ABCD
burjua-demokratik/ABCD
bo'sag'ador/ABCD
bo'shtob/ABCD
vazelinli/ABCD
vaqfdorlik/ABCD
varaqli/ABCD
vattmetr/ABCD
venerologiya/ABCD
vilk/ABCD
vozillov/ABCD
vujud/ABCD
gazgeneratorli/ABCD
gamartroma/ABCD
gard-g'ubor/ABCD
gektografik/ABCD
geometrik/ABCD
gidroagregat/ABCD
gidroelektrostansiya/ABCD
giper-yadro/ABCD
gramm-rad/ABCD
go'yoki/ABCD
gulpanjara/ABCD
gungurlashuv/ABCD
go'sxo'rlik/ABCD
davrapoya/ABCD
dalillash/ABCD
darang-durunglik/ABCD
daromadlilik/ABCD
daftarchilik/ABCD
devonatabiat/ABCD
dekan/ABCD
dendrometrnya/ABCD
deshifrovka/ABCD
diyonat/ABCD
dilnavoz/ABCD
diniya/ABCD
distillash/ABCD
dod-faryod/ABCD
dorivorli/ABCD
duvillash/ABCD
dumbaloqchi/ABCD
durvaza/ABCD
yov/ABCD
yog'-yajman/ABCD
yoqavayronlik/ABCD
yelinli/ABCD
yon-atrof/ABCD
yoptirish/ABCD
yosumanlik/ABCD
yeu/ABCD
javreishoq/ABCD
jangchrlatish/ABCD
jahongir/ABCD
jiqillash/ABCD
jirraki/ABCD
jonsarak/ABCD
jo'na/ABCD
zavqlanganlik/ABCD
zamonaviy/ABCD
zarlik/ABCD
zerdast/ABCD
zilol/ABCD
zonalar/ABCD
zulukzira/ABCD
ivib-bo'kib/ABCD
ijodiy/ABCD
izomerlashtirish/ABCD
iydlik/ABCD
ikariya/ABCD
ilgarilari/ABCD
ilonbaliq/ABCD
imoratsiz/ABCD
indonezcha/ABCD
inspeksiya/ABCD
insho/ABCD
irlandcha/ABCD
ismli/ABCD
itaruv/ABCD
yo'lbars/ABCD
ifodali/ABCD
ichkari-tashqari/ABCD
ishonganday/ABCD
kabir/ABCD
kayfli-kayfsiz/ABCD
kallapazlik/ABCD
kamg'ayratlik/ABCD
kamsuqum/ABCD
kapitanlik/ABCD
karmoncha/ABCD
kasir-kusur/ABCD
kvartallash/ABCD
kelinsiz/ABCD
keraklik/ABCD
ketayotganlik/ABCD
kibr-g'urursiz/ABCD
kinodekoratsiya/ABCD
kirishtirish/ABCD
kichrayuv/ABCD
kovariatsiya/ABCD
komandirlik/ABCD
konvoychi/ABCD
kontrrevolyutsion/ABCD
korsiz/ABCD
kranchi/ABCD
kuyovchaqirdi/ABCD
ko'kartiruv/ABCD
kulmasdan/ABCD
kundakovlik/ABCD
ko'ppak/ABCD
kur-qur/ABCD
kutuv/ABCD
kuya-muya/ABCD
qada/ABCD
qayqilik/ABCD
qaqqayish/ABCD
qamarsiymo/ABCD
qarag'aysimons-lar/ABCD
qartaboayaj/ABCD
qattiqqo'llik/ABCD
qiyot/ABCD
qiyinlik/ABCD
qilmdn/ABCD
qirg'oqdagi/ABCD
qisir/ABCD
qish-yoe/ABCD
qodir/ABCD
qu-qu/ABCD
qo'p-quruq/ABCD
qurollanuv/ABCD
quchoq/ABCD
qo'yarda-qo'ymay/ABCD
laim/ABCD
lapashanglik/ABCD
legitimatsiya/ABCD
liqqa-liqqa/ABCD
llevrokokk/ABCD
lopa/ABCD
lo'mbillamok/ABCD
mag'zu/ABCD
mayoq/ABCD
maydon/ABCD
makroiqlim/ABCD
mamnuniyat/ABCD
mantiqshunos/ABCD
martaba/ABCD
matonatlilik/ABCD
mahsichan/ABCD
ma'nan/ABCD
mezoserafit/ABCD
metodik/ABCD
meshchanlik/ABCD
mildiratish/ABCD
minerallash/ABCD
mitticha/ABCD
moylash-sovutish/ABCD
morganizm/ABCD
moshkichiri/ABCD
mudarris/ABCD
mo'ynado'zlik/ABCD
mo'loq/ABCD
murakkabguldoshlar/ABCD
musovot/ABCD
muhr/ABCD
navbatlilik/ABCD
nazr-niyoz/ABCD
namsevar/ABCD
natijasna/ABCD
nevrolog/ABCD
nigoh/ABCD
nisbatsiz/ABCD
nogiroilik/ABCD
nomard/ABCD
normalash/ABCD
no'noqlashish/ABCD
obiravon/ABCD
ovozdorlik/ABCD
odamkush/ABCD
ozayuvchi/ABCD
oynaxalta/ABCD
oqliq/ABCD
oldnniga/ABCD
oltinchi/ABCD
onajon/ABCD
ora-orasiga/ABCD
or-nomusli/ABCD
osuv/ABCD
otlantiruv/ABCD
ohistao'tar/ABCD
oshiqlik/ABCD
payhonchi/ABCD
papax/ABCD
parishonhollik/ABCD
parchalanuvchi/ABCD
penitsillin/ABCD
pivochilik/ABCD
picha/ABCD
plevrit/ABCD
poydor/ABCD
pomol/ABCD
prakrit/ABCD
proton/ABCD
purkagich/ABCD
ravish/ABCD
radiotelegrafist/ABCD
raqschi/ABCD
rafoqat/ABCD
registrator/ABCD
relyativizm/ABCD
retseptura/ABCD
rodonig/ABCD
rulsiz/ABCD
sabzifurush/ABCD
savodxonlik/ABCD
saylapma/ABCD
sallox/ABCD
sandiq/ABCD
sarbalandlik/ABCD
sarobsimon/ABCD
safo/ABCD
sevdirish/ABCD
selitra/ABCD
serg'alva/ABCD
seroblik/ABCD
sershira/ABCD
sizdek/ABCD
simsiz/ABCD
sip-silliq/ABCD
skver/ABCD
sovutish/ABCD
soliq/ABCD
soflik/ABCD
spektrometr/ABCD
sterilizatsiyalash/ABCD
suvli/ABCD
suzdirish/ABCD
so'lituv/ABCD
surg'uchlov/ABCD
suf/ABCD
s'yomkachilii/ABCD
tavan/ABCD
tajribachilik/ABCD
taqaluv/ABCD
talatish/ABCD
tanbur/ABCD
tansachi/ABCD
tarvuzsimon/ABCD
taxlov/ABCD
tashlash/ABCD
tebranish/ABCD
teich/ABCD
tematik-g'oyaviy/ABCD
tepong'yachlik/ABCD
teskarilik/ABCD
tiyrandozlik/ABCD
tillaqo'ng'iz/ABCD
tipiklashtirish/ABCD
tirriq/ABCD
tovon/ABCD
toylash/ABCD
tomizuvchi/ABCD
tor/ABCD
toshli/ABCD
tripsin/ABCD
to'g'rashuv/ABCD
tuzuk-tuzuk/ABCD
to'qitish/ABCD
tumbochka/ABCD
to'poslik/ABCD
turmoqlik/ABCD
tutatqi/ABCD
tushuv/ABCD
uvush/ABCD
o'zaksizlik/ABCD
uzoqlash/ABCD
o'yinchi/ABCD
ukrainalik/ABCD
ulashtirish/ABCD
o'miz/ABCD
o'pka-gina/ABCD
o'rinsizlik/ABCD
urug'kurtak/ABCD
ustun/ABCD
o'tmishdoshlik/ABCD
uchirish/ABCD
o'edprtirish/ABCD
faksimile/ABCD
farqlaganlik/ABCD
fayans/ABCD
fikrlashganlik/ABCD
foytunchi/ABCD
fotoavtomat/ABCD
frontchi/ABCD
xarrot/ABCD
xiyol/ABCD
xiralov/ABCD
xoka/ABCD
xonlarxoni/ABCD
xronografik/ABCD
xundorlik/ABCD
xushadolik/ABCD
xushxosiyatli/ABCD
sianamid/ABCD
chaynalgan/ABCD
chaqchayuv/ABCD
chang'ichilik/ABCD
charx/ABCD
chekka-chekyada/ABCD
chigallanganlik/ABCD
chiqiqlik/ABCD
chinachoqsimon/ABCD
chirsildoq/ABCD
chokpardoz/ABCD
chorpahil/ABCD
cho'zg'i/ABCD
chulpak-chulpak/ABCD
cho'tka-taroq/ABCD
shaydolik/ABCD
shamol/ABCD
shaharchi/ABCD
shivit/ABCD
shilpiqlanish/ABCD
shirguruch/ABCD
shlakbeton/ABCD
shokilnsiz/ABCD
shohlik/ABCD
shum/ABCD
earifa/ABCD
egiz/ABCD
ezlashtiruvchi/ABCD
eklattirish/ABCD
ekuvchi/ABCD
elevator/ABCD
elqib-yalash/ABCD
el-yal/ABCD
engashtirmo/ABCD
epitelial/ABCD
eronlik/ABCD
estradachi/ABCD
eshakbodring/ABCD
yupqalik/ABCD
yangilovchi/ABCD
yarimfabrikat/ABCD
yashamagur/ABCD
